Washington statutes.
RCW 6.21.100

Sale of real property to highest bidder—Sheriff's return and certificate of sale.

(1)(a) The officer shall strike off the land to the highest bidder, who shall forthwith pay the money bid to the officer or to their agent conducting the sale by electronic media. The sheriff or their agent conducting the sale by electronic media shall tender the money to the clerk of the court that issued the writ.

(b) When final judgment shall have been entered in the supreme court or the court of appeals and the execution upon which sale has been made issued from said court, the return shall be made to the superior court in which the action was originally commenced, and the same proceedings shall be had as though execution had issued from that superior court.

(2) At the time of the sale, the sheriff shall prepare a certificate of the sale, containing a particular description of the property sold, the price bid for each distinct lot or parcel, and the whole price paid; and when subject to redemption, it shall be so stated. The matters contained in such certificate shall be substantially stated in the sheriff's return of proceedings upon the writ. Upon receipt of the purchase price, the sheriff shall give a copy of the certificate to the purchaser and the original certificate to the clerk of the court with the return on the execution to hold for delivery to the purchaser upon confirmation of the sale.

[ 2021 c 122 s 14; 1987 c 442 s 610; 1971 c 81 s 28; Code 1881 s 366; 1877 p 79 s 369; 1869 p 95 s 362; 1854 p 182 s 265; RRS s 590. Formerly RCW 6.24.090.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 122: See note following RCW 2.32.050.